Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2958.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
A. Effective July 1, 2026, each state employee who was in full
time status as of June 30, 2026, shall receive a salary increase of
nine percent (9%).
B. The provisions of this section shall not be applicable to
any person employed by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education or employed by any college or university within The
Oklahoma State System of Higher Education.
C. The provisions of this section shall not be applicable to
any person employed by a common school district.

Req. No. 13978 Page 1

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-13978 MAH 12/22/25

















Req. No. 13978 Page 2